District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0484.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
Act may be cited as the “Fairness and Accuracy in Real Property Tax Assessments Amendment
Act of 2025”.

Sec. 2. Section 21-2601.10 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended by
adding a new subsection (h) to read as follows:
“(h) Notwithstanding any of other provision of law, a single power of attorney by a Letter
of Authorization may be granted for the purpose of representing a property owner before the
Office of Taxation and Revenue and the Real Property Tax Appeals Commission, and such
Letter of Authorization shall remain in effect until such time as ownership of the property subject
to the appeal changes, the Letter of Authorization is revoked, or a new Letter of Authorization is
filed, but no longer than three calendar years from the date of filing, whichever occurs first. A
Letter of Authorization is not required to be witnessed by a notary to be a valid authorization.”.
Sec. 3. Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
(a) Amend section 825.01a(e) as follows:
(1) Amend paragraph (4)(C)(ii) to read as follows:
“(ii) The Commission shall raise or lower the estimated market

value of any real property that it finds to be above or below the estimated market value for any
assessment appealed by an owner.”.
(2) Amend paragraph (7) as follows:
(A) Amend sub-paragraph (A) by striking the phrase “February” and
inserting the phrase “March” in its place.
(B) Amend sub-paragraph (B) by striking the phrase “a residential real
property case involving a single family residential property or a residential real property
consisting of 4 or fewer dwelling units and 80 days to decide a residential real property case
involving a residential real property with 5 or more dwelling units or a commercial real property
case” and inserting the phrase “the appeal” in its place.
(b) Amend section 4312 by adding a new subsection (g) to read as follows:
“(g) The Office of Tax and Revenue shall deliver to the owner and any authorized
representative all communications described in this section and communications related to the
judgment of the protest outlined in subsection (a) via electronic means, including email or an
online portal, if requested by the owner or such representative. Notwithstanding any other
provision of law, if electronic delivery is requested by the owner or such representative,
electronic delivery in the manner requested shall constitute sufficient delivery of notice.”.
Sec. 4. Title 9 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations is amended as follows:
(a) Section 2009.2 is amended as follows:
(1) Strike the phrase “seven (7) days” and insert the phrase “seven (7) business
days” in its place.
(2) Strike the phrase “ten (10) days” and insert the phrase “ten (10) business days”
in its place.

(b) Section 2009.3 is amended as follows:
(1) Strike the phrase “ten (10) days” and insert the phrase “ten (10) business days”
in its place.
(2) Strike the phrase “seven (7) days” and insert the phrase “seven (7) business
days” in its place.
Sec. 5. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 6. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.